pt-PT: Forma de queijo: Bloco; Esfarelado; Coalhada; Ralado; Rolo; Em fios; Fatias; Embalagem/para barrar; Cunha; Roda; Outro
fi: Juuston muoto: Pala; Murennettu; Juustomassa; Raastettu; Tanko; Raastettu; Viipaleet; Rasia/levite; Kiila; Kiekko; Muu
lt-LT: Sūrio forma: Blokas; Trupintas; Varškės grūdeliai; Smulkiai tarkuotas; Ritinėlis; Tarkuotas; Griežinėliai; Indelis / tepamasis; Trikampėlis; Ritinys; Kita
sv: Ostform: Block; Smulad; Ostmassa; Riven; Rulle; Strimlad; Skivor; Ask/bredbar ost; Tårtbit; Hjul; Övrigt
ro-RO: Formă de brânză: Bloc; Fărâmițată; Caș; Rasă; Rolă; Fâșii; Felii; Cutiuță/de întins; Triunghi; Roată; Altele
el: Μορφή τυριού: Μπλοκ; Θρυμματισμένο; Τυρόπηγμα; Τριμμένο; Κορμός; Χοντροτριμμένο; Φέτες; Κεσεδάκι/επάλειμμα; Τρίγωνο κομμάτι; Κεφάλι; Άλλο
vi: Hình dạng phô mai: Khối; Cắt vụn; Cục sữa đông; Bào vụn; Hình trụ tròn; Cắt sợi; Lát; Hộp/phết; Hình nêm; Bánh; Khác
nl: Kaas vorm: Blok; Verkruimeld; Wrongel; Geraspt; Rol; Geraspt; Plakjes; Kuipje/smeerkaas; Punt; Wiel; Overig
it: Forma di formaggio: Blocco; Sbriciolato; Fiocchi di formaggio; Grattugiato; Tronchetto; A scaglie; A fette; Vaschetta/Spalmabile; Spicchio; Forma intera; Altro
hr-HR: Oblik sira: Blok; Namrvljeno; Skuta; Naribano; Valjak; Usitnjeno; Kriške; U posudici / namaz; Trokut; Kolut; Ostalo
zh-CN: 奶酪形态: 块状; 碎块; 凝乳; 磨碎; 圆柱状; 切丝; 切片; 盒装/涂抹酱; 楔形; 轮状; 其他
pl: Forma sera: Blok; Kruszony; Twaróg; Tarty; Rolada; Wiórki; Plastry; W kubku / do smarowania; Klin; Krąg; Inny
hu: Sajt formája: Tömb; Morzsolt; Túrós; Reszelt; Henger; Reszelt (szálas); Szeletelt; Tégelyes / Kenhető; Cikkely; Sajtkerék; Egyéb
nb: Osteform: Blokk; Smuldret; Ostemasse; Revet; Rull; Revet; Skiver; Beger/smørepålegg; Trekantstykke; Hjul; Annet
ru: Форма сыра: Блок; Крошка; Сырное зерно; Тертый; Поленце; Стружка; Ломтики; Контейнер/спред; Клин; Головка; Другое
fr: Forme du fromage: Bloc; Émietté; En grains; Râpé; Bûche; Râpé; Tranches; En pot/à tartiner; Pointe; Meule; Autre
da: Osteform: Blok; Smuldret; Ostekorn; Revet; Rulle; Strimlet; Skiver; Bæger/smøreost; Trekant; Hjul; Andet
sk-SK: Forma syra: Blok; Rozdrobený; Hrudky; Nastrúhaný; Valček; Strúhaný; Plátky; Tégel/nátierka; Trojuholník; Bochník; Iné
sl-SI: Oblika sira: Blok; Nadrobljeno; Skuta; Naribano; Rulada; Narezano; Rezine; Banja/namaz; Trikotnik; Hlebec; Drugo
zh-TW: 起司形式: 塊狀; 碎塊; 凝乳; 磨碎; 長條狀; 絲狀; 片狀; 桶裝/抹醬; 楔形; 輪狀; 其他
en: Cheese form: Block; Crumbled; Curds; Grated; Log; Shredded; Slices; Tub/spread; Wedge; Wheel; Other
ja: チーズの形状: ブロック; クランブル; カード; すりおろし; ログ; シュレッド; スライス; カップ/スプレッド; ウェッジ; ホール; その他
ko: 치즈 형태: 블록; 크럼블; 커드; 간 치즈; 로그; 슈레드; 슬라이스; 튜브/스프레드; 웨지; 휠; 기타
th: รูปแบบของชีส: ก้อน; บดหยาบ; เคิร์ด; ขูดละเอียด; แท่งกลมยาว; ขูดเส้น; แผ่น; กระปุก/สเปรด; ลิ่ม; วงล้อ; อื่นๆ
es: Presentación del queso: Bloque; Desmenuzado; Cuajada; Rallado; Cilindro; En hebras; Rebanadas; Tarrina/untable; Cuña; Rueda; Otra
tr: Peynir formu: Blok; Ufalanmış; Lor; Rendelenmiş; Rulo; Rendelenmiş; Dilimler; Kutu/sürülebilir; Üçgen; Tekerlek; Diğer
de: Form des Käses: Block; Gekrümelt; Käsebruch; Gerieben; Rolle; Zerkleinert; Scheiben; Becher/Aufstrich; Ecke; Laib; Sonstiges
cs: Sýrová forma: Blok; Rozdrobený; Sýřenina; Strouhaný; Válec; Strouhaný (na proužky); Plátky; Vanička / k namazání; Výseč; Bochník; Jiná
bg-BG: Форма на сиренето: Блок; Натрошено; Извара; Настъргано; Руло; Нарязано на ивици; На филийки; В кутия/за мазане; На триъгълници; Пита; Други
pt-BR: Forma de queijo: Bloco; Esfarelado; Coalhada; Ralado; Cilindro; Desfiado; Fatias; Pote/creme; Cunha; Roda; Outro